Utah statutes.
48-3a-905.   Activities not constituting doing business.

(1)  Activities of a foreign limited liability company which do not constitute doing business in this state under this part include:

(a)  maintaining, defending, mediating, arbitrating, or settling an action or proceeding;

(b)  carrying on any activity concerning its internal affairs, including holding meetings of its members or managers;

(c)  maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

(d)  maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the securities of the foreign limited liability company or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

(e)  selling through independent contractors;

(f)  soliciting or obtaining orders by any means if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

(g)  creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in property;

(h)  securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or security interests in property securing the debts and holding, protecting, or maintaining property;

(i)  conducting an isolated transaction that is not in the course of similar transactions;

(j)  owning, without more, property; and

(k)  doing business in interstate commerce.

(2)  A person does not do business in this state solely by being a member or manager of a foreign limited liability company that does business in this state.

(3)  This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability company to service of process, taxation, or regulation under law of this state other than this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

